xal.dict
гиич/5,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,114,115,116,117,118,119,120,121,122,123,124,125,126,145,146,147,148,149,150,151,152,153,154,155,156,157,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,203,204,235,236,237,238,239,240,241,268,269,270,271,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,279
дал/2,3,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,85,86,87,88,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,145,146,147,148,149,150,151,152,153,154,155,156,157,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,203,204,235,236,237,238,239,240,241,268,269,270,271,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,279
зарһ/4,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,101,102,103,104,105,106,107,108,109,110,111,112,113,145,146,147,148,149,150,151,152,153,154,155,156,157,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,203,204,235,236,237,238,239,240,241,268,269,270,271,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,279
зөнг/2,3,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,85,86,87,88,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,145,146,147,148,149,150,151,152,153,154,155,156,157,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,203,204,235,236,237,238,239,240,241,268,269,270,271,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,279
комбайнч/5,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,114,115,116,117,118,119,120,121,122,123,124,125,126,145,146,147,148,149,150,151,152,153,154,155,156,157,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,203,204,235,236,237,238,239,240,241,268,269,270,271,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,279
корабль/2,3,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,85,86,87,88,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,145,146,147,148,149,150,151,152,153,154,155,156,157,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,203,204,235,236,237,238,239,240,241,268,269,270,271,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,279
кореец/2,3,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,85,86,87,88,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,145,146,147,148,149,150,151,152,153,154,155,156,157,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,203,204,235,236,237,238,239,240,241,268,269,270,271,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,279
орулһш/2,3,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,85,86,87,88,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,145,146,147,148,149,150,151,152,153,154,155,156,157,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,203,204,235,236,237,238,239,240,241,268,269,270,271,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,279
сөрв/4,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,101,102,103,104,105,106,107,108,109,110,111,112,113,145,146,147,148,149,150,151,152,153,154,155,156,157,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,203,204,235,236,237,238,239,240,241,268,269,270,271,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,279
филармонь/2,3,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,85,86,87,88,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,145,146,147,148,149,150,151,152,153,154,155,156,157,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,203,204,235,236,237,238,239,240,241,268,269,270,271,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,279
философч/5,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,114,115,116,117,118,119,120,121,122,123,124,125,126,145,146,147,148,149,150,151,152,153,154,155,156,157,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,203,204,235,236,237,238,239,240,241,268,269,270,271,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,279
хадасч/5,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,114,115,116,117,118,119,120,121,122,123,124,125,126,145,146,147,148,149,150,151,152,153,154,155,156,157,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,203,204,235,236,237,238,239,240,241,268,269,270,271,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,279
хард/2,3,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,85,86,87,88,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,145,146,147,148,149,150,151,152,153,154,155,156,157,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,203,204,235,236,237,238,239,240,241,268,269,270,271,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,279
шинрүлт/4,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,101,102,103,104,105,106,107,108,109,110,111,112,113,145,146,147,148,149,150,151,152,153,154,155,156,157,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,203,204,235,236,237,238,239,240,241,268,269,270,271,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,279
